District of Columbia statutes.
3-2305.12

Repealed

Denial or refusal to renew license; suspension or revocation; probationary conditions; reinstatement

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(i), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-1705.1 to 2-1705.18.